Florida, session 2026, SB988.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âMarine and Aquatic 18 Native Threatened Animal Protection Act.â 19 Section 2.âSection 379.24312, Florida Statutes, is created 20 to read: 21 379.24312âMarine and aquatic native threatened animal 22 protections.â 23 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 24 (a)ââAquatic animalâ means any vertebrate or invertebrate 25 animal species, subspecies, or distinct population segment that 26 inhabits state waters. 27 (b)ââEndangered, threatened, or vulnerable speciesâ means 28 any species included on the official Florida list of endangered 29 and threatened species maintained by the commission or 30 classified as endangered or vulnerable in the International 31 Union for Conservation of Natureâs Red List of Threatened 32 Species. 33 (c)ââExhibition or educational purposesâ means the holding, 34 displaying, transporting, or maintaining of specimens for public 35 display, exhibition, research, or education, including 36 activities authorized under a special activity license issued by 37 the commission. 38 (2)âA person may not take, attempt to take, possess, 39 transport, or export any endangered, threatened, or vulnerable 40 aquatic animal species from state waters for exhibition or 41 educational purposes. 42 (3)âThe commission may not issue, renew, or approve a 43 special activity license or other authorization that would allow 44 the taking of any endangered, threatened, or vulnerable aquatic 45 animal species from state waters for purposes prohibited in 46 subsection (2). 47 (4)âA person who violates this section commits a Level Four 48 violation under s. 379.401. Each individual animal taken or 49 exported in violation of this section constitutes a separate 50 offense. 51 (5)(a)âThis section does not prohibit or restrict the 52 rescue, rehabilitation, or scientific study of aquatic animal 53 species when such activities are conducted under state or 54 federal authorization consistent with the Endangered Species Act 55 and applicable commission rules. 56 (b)âNothing in this section shall be construed to limit 57 federal authority under the Endangered Species Act, the 58 Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act, or the 59 Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild 60 Fauna and Flora. 61 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 62 379.401, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 63 379.401âPenalties and violations; civil penalties for 64 noncriminal infractions; criminal penalties; suspension and 65 forfeiture of licenses and permits.â 66 (4)âLEVEL FOUR VIOLATIONS.â 67 (a)âA person commits a Level Four violation if he or she 68 violates any of the following provisions: 69 1.âSection 379.24312, prohibiting the taking, attempted 70 taking, possession, transport, or export of certain aquatic 71 animals for exhibition or educational purposes. 72 2.1.âSection 379.354(16), prohibiting the making, forging, 73 counterfeiting, or reproduction of a recreational license or the 74 possession of same without authorization from the commission. 75 3.2.âSection 379.365(2)(c), prohibiting criminal activities 76 relating to the taking of stone crabs. 77 4.3.âSection 379.366(4)(c), prohibiting criminal activities 78 relating to the taking and harvesting of blue crabs. 79 5.4.âSection 379.367(4), prohibiting the willful 80 molestation of spiny lobster gear. 81 6.5.âSection 379.3671(2)(c)5., prohibiting the unlawful 82 reproduction, possession, sale, trade, or barter of spiny 83 lobster trap tags or certificates. 84 7.6.âSection 379.404(5), prohibiting the sale of illegally 85 taken deer or wild turkey. 86 8.7.âSection 379.4041(2), prohibiting the sale of illegally 87 taken bears. 88 9.8.âSection 379.405, prohibiting the molestation or theft 89 of freshwater fishing gear. 90 10.9.âSection 379.409, prohibiting the unlawful killing, 91 injuring, possessing, or capturing of alligators or other 92 crocodilia or their eggs. 93 11.10.âSection 379.411, prohibiting the intentional killing 94 or wounding of any species designated as endangered, threatened, 95 or of special concern. 96 12.11.âSection 379.4115, prohibiting the killing of any 97 Florida or wild panther. 98 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.